Hawaii statutes.
§448-18 Hearings. In all proceedings
before it, the board and each member thereof shall have the same powers
respecting administering oaths, compelling the attendance of witnesses, and the
production of documentary evidence, and examining witnesses as are possessed by
circuit courts. In case of disobedience by any person of any order of the
board or of a member thereof, or of any subpoena issued by it or a member, or
the refusal of any witness to testify to any matter regarding which the witness
may be questioned lawfully, any circuit judge, on application by the board or a
member thereof, shall compel obedience as in the case of disobedience of the
requirements of a subpoena issued by a circuit court, or a refusal to testify
therein. [L 1949, c 177, §6; RL 1955, §61-18; am L 1965, c 96, §44; HRS
§448-18; am L 1973, c 31, pt of §21; gen ch 1985; am L 1988, c 85, §2; am L
1992, c 202, §78]

Rules of Court

Subpoenas, see HRCP rule 45.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next